New Jersey, session 221, A1054.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. R.S.23:5-9 is amended to read as follows: 23:5-9.  a.  (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2002, c.57). b.  (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2002, c.57). c.  (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2002, c.57). d.  (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2002, c.57). e.  (1)  The Department of Environmental Protection shall adopt, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations providing for the taking and management of the lobster of the genus and species Homarus americanus in the State. (2) The Commissioner of Environmental Protection shall regulate the lobster fishery in accordance with State policy as set forth in section 2 of P.L.1979, c.199 (C.23:2B-2). (3) The department shall prepare and issue an annual report on the taking, management, and status of lobster in the State.  Copies of the report shall be transmitted to the chairpersons of the Senate Environment Committee and the Assembly Agriculture and Natural Resources Committee, or their successors as designated by the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the General Assembly, respectively, and shall be made available to the public upon request. (4) Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, any limitation or restriction on the import, export, possession, purchase, sale, or offer to purchase or sell lobsters based upon size limits set for Lobster Management Areas identified by the department shall apply only to lobsters taken from the marine waters of the State. (cf: P.L.2002, c.57, s.1) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.